Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 5. MATTERS AFFECTING PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE C. MATTERS AFFECTING PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES OF MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 174. FIRE AND POLICE EMPLOYEE RELATIONS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 174.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as The Fire and Police Employee Relations Act.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.002. POLICY. (a) The policy of this state is that a political subdivision shall provide its fire fighters and police officers with compensation and other conditions of employment that are substantially the same as compensation and conditions of employment prevailing in comparable private sector employment.

(b) The policy of this state is that fire fighters and police officers, like employees in the private sector, should have the right to organize for collective bargaining, as collective bargaining is a fair and practical method for determining compensation and other conditions of employment. Denying fire fighters and police officers the right to organize and bargain collectively would lead to strife and unrest, consequently injuring the health, safety, and welfare of the public.

(c) The health, safety, and welfare of the public demands that strikes, lockouts, and work stoppages and slowdowns of fire fighters and police officers be prohibited, and therefore it is the state's duty to make available reasonable alternatives to strikes by fire fighters and police officers.

(d) Because of the essential and emergency nature of the public service performed by fire fighters and police officers, a reasonable alternative to strikes is a system of arbitration conducted under adequate legislative standards. Another reasonable alternative, if the parties fail to agree to arbitrate, is judicial enforcement of the requirements of this chapter regarding compensation and conditions of employment applicable to fire fighters and police officers.

(e) With the right to strike prohibited, to maintain the high morale of fire fighters and police officers and the efficient operation of the departments in which they serve, alternative procedures must be expeditious, effective, and binding.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.003. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Association" means any type of organization, including an agency or employee representation committee or plan, in which fire fighters, police officers, or both, participate and that exists, in whole or in part, to deal with one or more public or private employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, or conditions of employment affecting fire fighters, police officers, or both.

(2) "Fire fighter" means a permanent, paid employee of the fire department of a political subdivision. The term does not include:

(A) the chief of the department; or

(B) a volunteer fire fighter.

(3) "Police officer" means a paid employee who is sworn, certified, and full-time, and who regularly serves in a professional law enforcement capacity in the police department of a political subdivision. The term does not include the chief of the department.

(4) "Political subdivision" includes a municipality.

(5) "Public employer" means the official or group of officials of a political subdivision whose duty is to establish the compensation, hours, and other conditions of employment of fire fighters, police officers, or both, and may include the mayor, city manager, town manager, town administrator, municipal governing body, director of personnel, personnel board, commissioners, or another official or combination of those persons.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 13.16, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 174.004. LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION. This chapter shall be liberally construed.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.005. PREEMPTION OF OTHER LAW. This chapter preempts all contrary local ordinances, executive orders, legislation, or rules adopted by the state or by a political subdivision or agent of the state, including a personnel board, civil service commission, or home-rule municipality.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.006. EFFECT ON CIVIL SERVICE PROVISIONS. (a) A state or local civil service provision prevails over a collective bargaining contract under this chapter unless the collective bargaining contract specifically provides otherwise.

(b) A civil service provision may not be repealed or modified by arbitration or judicial action but may be interpreted or enforced by an arbitrator or court.

(c) This chapter does not limit the authority of a municipal fire chief or police chief under Chapter 143 except as modified by the parties through collective bargaining.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.007. EFFECT ON EXISTING BENEFITS. This chapter may not be construed as repealing any existing benefit provided by statute or ordinance concerning fire fighters' or police officers' compensation, pensions, retirement plans, hours of work, conditions of employment, or other emoluments. This chapter is in addition to the benefits provided by existing statutes and ordinances.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.008. WAIVER OF IMMUNITY. This chapter is binding and enforceable against the employing public employer, and sovereign or governmental immunity from suit and liability is waived only to the extent necessary to enforce this chapter against that employer.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1200 (H.B. 1473), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER B. CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT AND RIGHT TO ORGANIZE

Sec. 174.021. PREVAILING WAGE AND WORKING CONDITIONS REQUIRED. A political subdivision that employs fire fighters, police officers, or both, shall provide those employees with compensation and other conditions of employment that are:

(1) substantially equal to compensation and other conditions of employment that prevail in comparable employment in the private sector; and

(2) based on prevailing private sector compensation and conditions of employment in the labor market area in other jobs that require the same or similar skills, ability, and training and may be performed under the same or similar conditions.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.022. CERTAIN PUBLIC EMPLOYERS CONSIDERED TO BE IN COMPLIANCE. (a) A public employer that has reached an agreement with an association on compensation or other conditions of employment as provided by this chapter is considered to be in compliance with the requirements of Section 174.021 as to the conditions of employment for the duration of the agreement.

(b) If an arbitration award is rendered as provided by Subchapter E, the public employer involved is considered to be in compliance with the requirements of Section 174.021 as to the conditions of employment provided by the award for the duration of the collective bargaining period to which the award applies.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.023. RIGHT TO ORGANIZE AND BARGAIN COLLECTIVELY. On adoption of this chapter or the law codified by this chapter by a political subdivision to which this chapter applies, fire fighters, police officers, or both are entitled to organize and bargain collectively with their public employer regarding compensation, hours, and other conditions of employment.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER C. ADOPTION AND REPEAL OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING PROVISIONS

Sec. 174.051. ADOPTION ELECTION. (a) The governing body of a political subdivision to which this chapter applies shall order an election for the adoption of this chapter on receiving a petition signed by qualified voters of the political subdivision in a number equal to or greater than the lesser of:

(1) 20,000; or

(2) five percent of the number of qualified voters voting in the political subdivision in the preceding general election for state and county officers.

(b) The governing body shall hold the election on the first authorized uniform election date prescribed by Chapter 41, Election Code, that allows sufficient time for compliance with any requirements established by law.

(c) The ballot in the election shall be printed to provide for voting for or against the proposition: "Adoption of the state law applicable to (fire fighters, police officers, or both, as applicable) that establishes collective bargaining if a majority of the affected employees favor representation by an employees association, preserves the prohibition against strikes and lockouts, and provides penalties for strikes and lockouts."

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.052. EFFECT OF SUCCESSFUL ADOPTION ELECTION. If a majority of the votes cast in an election under Section 174.051 favor adoption of this chapter, the governing body shall place this chapter in effect not later than the 30th day after the beginning of the first fiscal year of the political subdivision after the election.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.053. REPEAL ELECTION. (a) The governing body of a political subdivision in which the collective bargaining provisions of this chapter have been in effect for at least one year shall order an election for the repeal of the adoption of this chapter on receiving a petition signed by qualified voters of the political subdivision in a number equal to or greater than the lesser of:

(1) 20,000; or

(2) five percent of the number of qualified voters voting in the political subdivision in the preceding general election for state and county officers.

(b) The ballot in the election shall be printed to provide for voting for or against the proposition: "Repeal of the adoption of the state law applicable to (fire fighters, police officers, or both, as applicable) that establishes collective bargaining if a majority of the affected employees favor representation by an employees association, preserves the prohibition against strikes and lockouts, and provides penalties for strikes and lockouts."

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.054. EFFECT OF SUCCESSFUL REPEAL ELECTION. If a majority of the votes cast in an election under Section 174.053 favor repeal of the adoption of this chapter, the collective bargaining provisions of this chapter are void as to the political subdivision.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.055. FREQUENCY OF ELECTIONS. If an election for the adoption or the repeal of the adoption of this chapter is held under this subchapter, a like petition for a subsequent election may not be submitted before the first anniversary of the date of the preceding election.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER D. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING

Sec. 174.101. RECOGNITION OF BARGAINING AGENT FOR FIRE FIGHTERS. A public employer shall recognize an association selected by a majority of the fire fighters of the fire department of a political subdivision as the exclusive bargaining agent for the fire fighters of that department unless a majority of the fire fighters withdraw the recognition.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.102. RECOGNITION OF BARGAINING AGENT FOR POLICE OFFICERS. A public employer shall recognize an association selected by a majority of the police officers of the police department of a political subdivision as the exclusive bargaining agent for the police officers of that department unless a majority of the police officers withdraw the recognition.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.103. SINGLE BARGAINING AGENT FOR FIRE FIGHTERS AND POLICE OFFICERS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the fire and police departments of a political subdivision are separate collective bargaining units under this chapter.

(b) Associations that represent employees in the fire and police departments of a political subdivision may voluntarily join together for collective bargaining with the public employer.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.104. QUESTION REGARDING REPRESENTATION. (a) A question of whether an association is the majority representative of the employees of a department under Sections 174.101-174.103 shall be resolved by a fair election conducted according to procedures agreed on by the parties.

(b) If the parties are unable to agree on election procedures under Subsection (a), either party may request the American Arbitration Association to conduct the election and certify the results. Certification of the results of an election under this section shall resolve the question regarding representation. The public employer shall pay the expenses of the election, except that if two or more associations seek recognition as the bargaining agent, the associations shall pay the costs of the election equally.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.105. DUTY TO BARGAIN COLLECTIVELY IN GOOD FAITH. (a) If the fire fighters, police officers, or both of a political subdivision are represented by an association as provided by Sections 174.101-174.104, the public employer and the association shall bargain collectively.

(b) For purposes of this section, the duty to bargain collectively means a public employer and an association shall:

(1) meet at reasonable times;

(2) confer in good faith regarding compensation, hours, and other conditions of employment or the negotiation of an agreement or a question arising under an agreement; and

(3) execute a written contract incorporating any agreement reached, if either party requests a written contract.

(c) This section does not require a public employer or an association to:

(1) agree to a proposal; or

(2) make a concession.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.106. DESIGNATION OF NEGOTIATOR. A public employer or an association may designate one or more persons to negotiate or bargain on its behalf.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.107. NOTICE TO PUBLIC EMPLOYER REGARDING CERTAIN ISSUES. If compensation or another matter that requires an appropriation of money by any governing body is included for collective bargaining under this chapter, an association shall serve on the public employer a written notice of its request for collective bargaining at least 120 days before the date on which the public employer's current fiscal operating budget ends.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.108. OPEN DELIBERATIONS. A deliberation relating to collective bargaining between a public employer and an association, a deliberation by a quorum of an association authorized to bargain collectively, or a deliberation by a member of a public employer authorized to bargain collectively shall be open to the public and comply with state law.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.109. EFFECT OF AGREEMENT. An agreement under this chapter is binding and enforceable against a public employer, an association, and a fire fighter or police officer covered by the agreement.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER E. MEDIATION; ARBITRATION

Sec. 174.151. MEDIATION. (a) A public employer and an association that is a bargaining agent may use mediation to assist them in reaching an agreement.

(b) If a mediator is used, then a mediator may be appointed by agreement of the parties or by an appropriate state agency.

(c) A mediator may:

(1) hold separate or joint conferences as the mediator considers expedient to settle issues voluntarily, amicably, and expeditiously; and

(2) notwithstanding Subsection (d), recommend or suggest to the parties any proposal or procedure that in the mediator's judgment might lead to settlement.

(d) A mediator may not:

(1) make a public recommendation on any negotiation issue in connection with the mediator's service; or

(2) make a public statement or report that evaluates the relative merits of the parties' positions.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.152. IMPASSE. (a) For purposes of this subchapter, an impasse in the collective bargaining process is considered to have occurred if the parties do not settle in writing each issue in dispute before the 61st day after the date on which the collective bargaining process begins.

(b) The period specified in Subsection (a) may be extended by written agreement of the parties. An extension must be for a definite period not to exceed 15 days.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.153. REQUEST FOR ARBITRATION; AGREEMENT TO ARBITRATE. (a) Except as provided by Section 174.1535, a public employer or an association that is a bargaining agent may request the appointment of an arbitration board if:

(1) the parties:

(A) reach an impasse in collective bargaining; or

(B) are unable to settle after the appropriate lawmaking body fails to approve a contract reached through collective bargaining;

(2) the parties made every reasonable effort, including mediation, to settle the dispute through good-faith collective bargaining; and

(3) the public employer or association gives written notice to the other party, specifying the issue in dispute.

(b) A request for arbitration must be made not later than the fifth day after:

(1) the date an impasse was reached under Section 174.152; or

(2) the expiration of an extension period under Section 174.152.

(c) An election by both parties to arbitrate must:

(1) be made not later than the fifth day after the date arbitration is requested; and

(2) be a written agreement to arbitrate.

(d) A party may not request arbitration more than once in a fiscal year.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 342 (S.B. 736), Sec. 1, eff. June 2, 2023.

Sec. 174.1535. MANDATORY ARBITRATION. (a) This section applies only to:

(1) a fire department that serves a municipality with a population of 1.9 million or more; and

(2) an association that is a bargaining agent for the employees of a fire department described by Subdivision (1).

(b) A public employer and an association that is a bargaining agent shall submit to binding interest arbitration if the parties:

(1) reach an impasse in collective bargaining; or

(2) are unable to settle after the 61st day after the date the appropriate lawmaking body fails to approve a contract reached through collective bargaining.

(c) Each party shall send to the other party a written notice specifying each issue in dispute for purposes of binding arbitration not later than the fifth day after:

(1) the date an impasse was reached under Section 174.152;

(2) the expiration of an extension period under Section 174.152; or

(3) the expiration of the period described by Subsection (b)(2).

(d) A notice under Subsection (c) is considered sent on the date the notice is placed in the mail, personally delivered, or transmitted by e-mail or any other means of electronic transfer.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 342 (S.B. 736), Sec. 2, eff. June 2, 2023.

Sec. 174.154. ARBITRATION BOARD. (a) Not later than the fifth day after the date an agreement to arbitrate is executed, each party shall:

(1) select one arbitrator; and

(2) immediately notify the other party in writing of the name and address of the arbitrator selected.

(b) Not later than the 10th day after the date an agreement to arbitrate is executed, the arbitrators named under Subsection (a) shall attempt to select a third (neutral) arbitrator. If the arbitrators are unable to agree on a third arbitrator, either party may request the American Arbitration Association to select the third arbitrator, and the American Arbitration Association may appoint the third arbitrator according to its fair and regular procedures. Unless both parties consent, the third arbitrator may not be the same individual who served as a mediator under Section 174.151.

(c) The arbitrator selected under Subsection (b) presides over the arbitration board.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.155. ARBITRATION HEARING. (a) A presiding arbitrator shall:

(1) call a hearing to be held not later than the 10th day after the date on which the presiding arbitrator is appointed; and

(2) notify the other arbitrators, the public employer, and the association in writing of the time and place of the hearing, not later than the eighth day before the hearing.

(b) An arbitration hearing shall end not later than the 20th day after the date the hearing begins.

(c) An arbitration hearing shall be informal.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.156. SCOPE OF ARBITRATION. (a) The issues to be arbitrated are all matters the parties are unable to resolve through collective bargaining and mediation procedures required by this chapter.

(b) An arbitration board shall render an award in accordance with the requirements of Section 174.021. In settling disputes relating to compensation, hours, and other conditions of employment, the board shall consider:

(1) hazards of employment;

(2) physical qualifications;

(3) educational qualifications;

(4) mental qualifications;

(5) job training;

(6) skills; and

(7) other factors.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.157. EVIDENCE; OATH; SUBPOENA. (a) The rules of evidence applicable to judicial proceedings are not binding in an arbitration hearing.

(b) An arbitration board may:

(1) receive in evidence any documentary evidence or other information the board considers relevant;

(2) administer oaths; and

(3) issue subpoenas to require:

(A) the attendance and testimony of witnesses; and

(B) the production of books, records, and other evidence relevant to an issue presented to the board for determination.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.158. ARBITRATION AWARD. (a) Not later than the 10th day after the end of the hearing, an arbitration board shall:

(1) make written findings; and

(2) render a written award on the issues presented to the board.

(b) A copy of the findings and award shall be mailed or delivered to the public employer and the association.

(c) An increase in compensation awarded by an arbitration board under this subchapter may take effect only at the beginning of the next fiscal year after the date of the award.

(d) If a new fiscal year begins after the initiation of arbitration procedures under this subchapter, Subsection (c) does not apply and an increase in compensation may be retroactive to the beginning of the fiscal year.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.159. EFFECT OF AWARD. If a majority decision of an arbitration board is supported by competent, material, and substantial evidence on the whole record, the decision:

(1) is final and binding on the parties; and

(2) may be enforced by either party or the arbitration board in a district court for the judicial district in which a majority of the affected employees reside.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.160. AMENDMENT OF AWARD. The parties to an arbitration award may amend the award by written agreement at any time.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.161. BEGINNING OF NEW FISCAL YEAR. If a new fiscal year begins after the initiation of arbitration procedures under this subchapter but before an award is rendered or enforced:

(1) the dispute is not moot;

(2) the jurisdiction of the arbitration board is not impaired; and

(3) the arbitration award is not impaired.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.162. EXTENSION OF PERIOD. A period specified by Section 174.155 or 174.158 may be extended:

(1) by the written agreement of the parties for a reasonable period; or

(2) by the arbitration board for good cause for one or more periods that in the aggregate do not exceed 20 days.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.163. COMPULSORY ARBITRATION NOT REQUIRED. This chapter does not require compulsory arbitration.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.164. COMPENSATION OF ARBITRATORS; EXPENSES OF ARBITRATION. (a) The compensation of an arbitrator selected by a public employer shall be paid by the public employer.

(b) The compensation, if any, of an arbitrator selected by fire fighters, police officers, or both shall be paid by the association representing the employees.

(c) The public employer and the association representing the employees shall jointly pay in even proportions:

(1) the compensation of the neutral arbitrator; and

(2) the stenographic and other expenses incurred by the arbitration board in connection with the arbitration proceedings.

(d) If a party to arbitration requires a transcript of the arbitration proceedings, the party shall pay the cost of the transcript.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER F. STRIKES; LOCKOUTS

Sec. 174.201. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "strike" means failing to report for duty in concerted action with others, wilfully being absent from one's position, stopping work, abstaining from the full, faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment, or interfering with the operation of a municipality in any manner, to induce, influence, or coerce a change in the conditions, compensation, rights, privileges, or obligations of employment.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.202. STRIKES, SLOWDOWNS, AND LOCKOUTS PROHIBITED. (a) A fire fighter or police officer may not engage in a strike or slowdown.

(b) A lockout of fire fighters or police officers is prohibited.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.203. LOCKOUT BY MUNICIPALITY; INJUNCTION; PENALTY. If a municipality or its designated agent or a department or agency head engages in a lockout of fire fighters or police officers, a court shall:

(1) prohibit the lockout;

(2) impose a fine not to exceed $2,000 on any individual violator; or

(3) both prohibit the lockout and impose the fine.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.204. STRIKE; PENALTY AGAINST ASSOCIATION. (a) A district court for the judicial district in which a municipality is located that finds that an association has called, ordered, aided, or abetted a strike by fire fighters or police officers shall:

(1) impose a fine on the association for each day of the strike equal to 1/26 of the total of the association's annual membership dues, but not less than $2,500 nor more than $20,000; and

(2) order the forfeiture of any membership dues checkoff for a specified period not to exceed 12 months.

(b) If the court finds that the municipality or its representative engaged in acts of extreme provocation that detract substantially from the association's responsibility for the strike, the court may reduce the amount of the fine.

(c) An association that appeals a fine under Subsection (b) is not required to pay the fine until the appeal is finally determined.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.205. STRIKE; PENALTY AGAINST INDIVIDUAL. If a fire fighter or police officer engages in a strike, interferes with the municipality, prevents the municipality from engaging in its duty, directs any employee of the municipality to decline to work or to stop or slow down work, causes another to fail or refuse to deliver goods or services to the municipality, pickets for any of those unlawful acts, or conspires to perform any of those acts:

(1) the fire fighter's or police officer's compensation in any form may not increase in any manner until after the first anniversary of the date the individual resumes normal working duties; and

(2) the fire fighter or police officer shall be on probation for two years regarding civil service status, tenure of employment, or contract of employment to which the individual was previously entitled.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER G. JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT AND REVIEW

Sec. 174.251. JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT GENERALLY. A district court for the judicial district in which a municipality is located, on the application of a party aggrieved by an act or omission of the other party that relates to the rights or duties under this chapter, may issue a restraining order, temporary or permanent injunction, contempt order, or other writ, order, or process appropriate to enforce this chapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.252. JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT WHEN PUBLIC EMPLOYER DECLINES ARBITRATION. (a) If an association requests arbitration as provided by Subchapter E and a public employer refuses to engage in arbitration, on the application of the association, a district court for the judicial district in which a majority of affected employees reside may enforce the requirements of Section 174.021 as to any unsettled issue relating to compensation or other conditions of employment of fire fighters, police officers, or both.

(b) If the court finds that the public employer has violated Section 174.021, the court shall:

(1) order the public employer to make the affected employees whole as to the employees' past losses;

(2) declare the compensation or other conditions of employment required by Section 174.021 for the period, not to exceed one year, as to which the parties are bargaining; and

(3) award the association reasonable attorney's fees.

(c) The court costs of an action under this section, including costs for a master if one is appointed, shall be taxed to the public employer.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 174.253. JUDICIAL REVIEW OF ARBITRATION AWARD. (a) An award of an arbitration board may be reviewed by a district court for the judicial district in which the municipality is located only on the grounds that:

(1) the arbitration board was without jurisdiction;

(2) the arbitration board exceeded its jurisdiction;

(3) the order is not supported by competent, material, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or

(4) the order was obtained by fraud, collusion, or similar unlawful means.

(b) The pendency of a review proceeding does not automatically stay enforcement of the arbitration board's order.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.